Hawaii, session 2026, SB1082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that anchialine pools, also known as wai ōpae, are considered wahi pana, or culturally sacred, special ecosystems in Hawaii.  Of the seven hundred recorded anchialine pools in Hawaii, over six hundred fifty pools are located in the county of Hawaii, mostly in the districts of north and south Kona and Kaū. The ʻōpae ula is a species of shrimp endemic to Hawaii's anchialine pools. The population of ōpae ula is an important indicator of the health of an anchialine pool. In healthy anchialine pools, the population of ōpae ula is abundant. The legislature further finds that the designation of the ōpae ula as the state shrimp will raise awareness of the ōpae ula and support efforts to protect anchialine pool ecosystems throughout the State as a natural resource.  In designating the ōpae ula as the state shrimp, the legislature does not intend to prevent or impact the traditional and ongoing practice of harvesting ōpae to be used in ōpelu fishing. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish ʻōpae ula as the state shrimp. SECTION 2. Chapter 5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§5-     State shrimp.  The ʻōpae ʻula (Halocaridina rubra), also known as the red shrimp, is established and designated as the official shrimp of the State." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________